Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5587.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "community violence intervention and prevention act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Community violence" means life-threatening interpersonal violence committed outside the context of a familial or romantic relationship, including, but not limited to, nonfatal firearm injury, aggravated assault, and homicide. Community violence does not include an act of violence motivated by a political belief. (b) "Eligible local unit of government" means a county, township, city, or village that meets both of the following: (i) Has experienced 35 or more homicides in the last 2 out of 3 years or has experienced 20 or more homicides with a homicide rate that is not less than double the national average homicide rate in the last 2 out of 3 years. (ii) Has a compelling need to address community violence, as determined by using the framework in the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's "A Public Health Approach to Community Violence Prevention". (c) "Fund" means the community violence intervention and prevention fund created under section 7. (d) "Office" means the office of community violence intervention and prevention services created in the office of community violence intervention and prevention services act. (e) "Program" means the community violence intervention and prevention grant program created under section 5. Sec. 5. (1) The office shall create the community violence intervention and prevention grant program to award grants to either of the following entities to support, enhance, and replicate coordinated intervention to address and prevent community violence: (a) A community-based nonprofit organization that serves the residents in an eligible local unit of government and has a history of providing community-related activities or support program innovation in communities with crime statistics at or above the national average. (b) Subject to subsection (2), an eligible local unit of government. (2) The office shall not disburse more than 15% of the money in the fund to 1 or more eligible local units of government. (3) An entity that is awarded a grant under subsection (1) shall use the grant to implement coordinated community violence intervention and prevention initiatives through coordinated, community-based strategies that meet all of the following: (a) Are evidence-informed and have demonstrated promise at reducing community violence without contributing to mass incarceration. (b) Utilize trauma-responsive care and interrupt cycles of violence. (c) Expand economic opportunity through new jobs, educational opportunities, or training programs. (d) Are primarily focused on individuals at risk of being victimized by, or engaging in, community violence. (4) An eligible local unit of government that receives a grant under subsection (1) shall distribute not less than 75% of the grant to a community-based or nonprofit organization or to a department of the eligible local unit of government that is not a law enforcement agency and that is primarily dedicated to the prevention of violence or to community safety. (5) An application for a grant under subsection (1) must include all of the following: (a) How the grant will be used to implement a coordinated community violence intervention or prevention initiative. (b) How the grant will be used to promote or improve coordination between relevant agencies and community organizations in order to minimize duplication of services, complement other community violence intervention or prevention efforts, and achieve maximum impact. (c) Evidence that indicates the proposed community violence intervention or prevention initiative would likely reduce community violence or address the trauma and collateral consequences for individuals at high risk of being victimized by, or engaging in, community violence. (d) How the applicant plans to ensure the community violence intervention or prevention initiative is implemented in a manner that is evidence-informed and coordinated with the programs and activities of other entities addressing community violence. (e) If the applicant is an eligible local unit of government, a demonstration of strong support from community partners with experience engaging individuals at high risk of being victimized by, or engaging in, community violence. (6) A person that receives a grant under this act shall provide a report to the office as follows: (a) If the person is an organization described under subsection (1)(a), an annual report for the organization that includes financial statements, demonstrates that program outcomes are aligned with the grant purpose, and lists staff and board members. (b) A community violence intervention and prevention impact report that contains information outlined by the task force created by Executive Order No. 2024-4. (7) Not later than the end of the fiscal year after the first grant award is made under this act and annually thereafter, the office shall publish a report that identifies best practices to implement community-based violence intervention and prevention initiatives. Sec. 7. (1) The community violence intervention and prevention fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The office is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The office shall expend money from the fund on appropriation, only to implement the program. Sec. 9. The department of health and human services shall promulgate rules to implement this act pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04697'25) or House Bill No. 5586 (request no. H04697'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.